Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.174

Date for annexation election if review board's determination favorable.

Upon receipt by the board of county commissioners of a determination by a majority of the review board favoring annexation of the proposed area that has been initiated by resolution pursuant to RCW 35.13.015 by the city or town legislative body, the board of county commissioners, or the city or town legislative body for any city or town within an urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, shall fix a date on which an annexation election shall be held, which date will be not less than thirty days nor more than sixty days thereafter.

[ 1997 c 429 s 38; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 17; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.174. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 429: See note following RCW 36.70A.3201.

Petition method—Fixing date of annexation election: RCW 35.13.060.

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.